Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-916
Property and assets relating to surplus and excess property programs; transferred to Department of Correctional Services; when.

Effective July 1, 1982, all property, assets, and liabilities relating to those federal surplus and excess property programs which are consolidated by Public Law 94-519 and operated by the Department of Transportation shall be transferred to the Department of Correctional Services.

Laws 1977, LB 548, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 536, § 4;

Laws 1982, LB 767, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 283.